Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 5. Highway Fencing Law.

§ 69-13-201.
Title of article.

This article shall be known as the “Highway Fencing Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876.7; Laws, 1956, ch. 185, §§ 1-7; Laws, 1958, ch. 221, §§ 1-6.

§ 69-13-203.
Intent of article.

It is the intent of this article to vest the boards of supervisors of the several counties of the state with broad discretion and power of determining the location and types of fences and cattlegaps on the highways referred to in Section 69-13-205.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876.7; Laws, 1956, ch. 185, §§ 1-7; Laws, 1958, ch. 221, §§ 1-6.

§ 69-13-205.
Authority and duty of supervisors.

The respective boards of supervisors of the several counties of the state, in their discretion, are authorized and directed to erect, construct and maintain suitable fences and cattlegaps along the right of ways of United States Highways and state designated highways to prevent livestock from running at large as provided hereinafter. However, nothing in this article shall apply in any county coming under the state stock law.

The board of supervisors in any county having voted to come within the provisions of the statewide stock law, may maintain any fence or fences constructed under the authority of this article from any funds not public funds, donated by any person, firm or corporation for said purposes and further, may receive and accept funds from the Mississippi State Highway Commission for the relocation of said fence or fences required by said commission. In its discretion and in the alternative, said board may authorize any person, firm or corporation to maintain said fence or fences.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876.7; Laws, 1956, ch. 185, §§ 1-7; Laws, 1958, ch. 221, §§ 1-6.

§ 69-13-207.
Tax; authority of supervisors to levy.

The boards of supervisors in said counties are hereby authorized and empowered in their discretion to levy a tax on the taxable property in said counties lying outside municipalities not exceeding two mills per annum thereon for the purpose of paying the cost of construction and maintenance of such fences and cattlegaps. In order to raise additional revenue for the purpose of paying the cost of construction and maintaining such fences and cattlegaps, the board of supervisors in those counties which have heretofore elected not to come under the statewide livestock law may in their discretion levy a tax against the owners of cattle permitted to roam at large in the amount of twenty-five cents (25¢) per head for cattle located in the respective counties in which an election has carried.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876.7; Laws, 1956, ch. 185, §§ 1-7; Laws, 1958, ch. 221, §§ 1-6.

§ 69-13-209.
Tax; election; use of proceeds; authority of supervisors where tax not authorized.

Before said board of supervisors is authorized to levy the aforesaid tax or erect such fences, it shall first be necessary that an election be held in each of such counties in accordance with the laws governing general election so far as possible to determine by majority vote of those voting in such election whether such tax shall be levied or such fences erected. And in said election only those electors outside the corporate limits of municipalities shall be eligible to vote. In the event the election is carried, such boards are authorized to construct such fences by use of convict labor, the funds derived from such tax, and with such aid as may be donated or contributed in material, labor or funds toward the erection of said fences and cattlegaps. In the event that the tax be not authorized at such election the board may nevertheless, in their discretion, erect such fences and cattlegaps by use of convict labor and such donations of labor, funds or materials as may be available, but shall not use public funds therefor.

In addition thereto, the counties bordering on the Gulf of Mexico now authorized by law to levy and collect a sea wall tax under Section 65-33-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, may use such proceeds of this tax as required to construct and maintain said fences and cattlegaps, but not to exceed one-half (1/2) mill of said sea wall tax.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876.7; Laws, 1956, ch. 185, §§ 1-7; Laws, 1958, ch. 221, §§ 1-6.

§ 69-13-211.
No reimbursement under Homestead Exemption Law.

No reimbursement shall be made under the Homestead Exemption Law of 1946 for any tax levy made under the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876.7; Laws, 1956, ch. 185, §§ 1-7; Laws, 1958, ch. 221, §§ 1-6.